Illinois, session 104th, HB2506.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-609.3 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-609.3)7    Sec. 3-609.3. Military series registration plates for 8veterans with disabilities. In lieu of receiving registration 9plates without the payment of a fee under Section 3-609, any 10veteran who holds proof of a 50% or greater service-connected 11disability from the United States Department of Veterans 12Affairs may apply for a military series registration plate in 13the manner prescribed by the Secretary of State. Upon the 14veteran showing proof of the disability, a military series 15registration plate may be issued to the veteran without fee 16for the registration of one motor vehicle of the first 17division or one motor vehicle of the second division weighing 18not more than 8,000 pounds. Any additional fee collected for 19the issuance and renewal of the military series registration 20plate, as may be specified in the provision authorizing the 21issuance of that special plate, shall not be included in the 22fee waiver authorized under this Section. 23(Source: P.A. 101-262, eff. 1-1-20.)